Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 5. Supervised Loans

§ 40-14-341.
Definitions. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-501; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-501; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-14-342.
Authority to make or enforce supervised loans. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-502; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-502; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§§ 40-14-343 through 40-14-347.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 191, §§ 3-503 though 3-507 related to license to make supervised loans, revocation or suspension of license, records and reports of supervised loans, examinations and investigations of supervised loans, and the applicability of the Administrative Procedure Act.

§ 40-14-348.
Loan finance charge. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-508; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-508; Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1; 1984, ch. 29, § 1; 1989, ch. 72, § 1; 1996, ch. 86, § 2; 2013 ch. 124, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-14-349.
Use of multiple agreements. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-509; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-509; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-14-350.
Restrictions on interest in land as security. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-510; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-510; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-14-351.
Regular schedule of payments; maximum loan term. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-511; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-511; Laws 1979, ch. 117, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-14-352.
Conduct of business other than making loans. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-512; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-512; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-14-353.
Limitation on attorney's fees. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-513; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-513; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.